North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 10. Law Enforcement and Confinement Facilities.
§ 153A-230.2.
Creation of Satellite Jail/Work Release Unit Fund. [Effective January 1, 2023]

There is created in the Office of State Budget and Management the County Satellite Jail/Work Release Unit Fund to provide State grant funds for counties or groups of counties for construction of satellite jail/work release units for certain misdemeanants who receive active sentences. A county or group of counties may apply to the Office for a grant under this section. The application shall be in a form established by the Office. The Office shall:

Develop application and grant criteria based on the basic requirements listed in this Part,

Provide all Boards of County Commissioners and Sheriffs with the criteria and appropriate application forms, technical assistance, if requested, and a proposed written agreement,

Review all applications,

Select grantees and award grants,

Award no more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for any one county or group of counties except that if a group of counties agrees to jointly operate one unit for males and one unit for females, the maximum amount may be awarded for each unit,

Take into consideration the potential number of misdemeanants and the percentage of the county’s or counties’ misdemeanant population to be diverted from the State prison system,

Take into consideration the utilization of existing buildings suitable for renovation where appropriate,

Take into consideration the timeliness with which a county proposes to complete and occupy the unit,

Take into consideration the appropriateness and cost effectiveness of the proposal,

Take into consideration the plan with which the county intends to coordinate the unit with other community service programs such as intensive supervision, community penalties, and community service.

When considering the items listed in subdivisions (6) through (10), the Office shall determine the appropriate weight to be given each item.

A county or group of counties is eligible for a grant under this section if it agrees to abide by the basic requirements for satellite jail/work release units established in

G.S. 153A-230.3

. In order to receive a grant under this section, there must be a written agreement to abide by the basic requirements for satellite jail/work release units set forth in

G.S. 153A-230.3

. The written agreement shall be signed by the Chairman of the Board of County Commissioners, with approval of the Board of County Commissioners and after consultation with the Sheriff, and a representative of the Office of State Budget and Management. If a group of counties applies for the grant, then the agreement must be signed by the Chairman of the Board of County Commissioners of each county. Any variation from, including termination of, the original signed agreement must be approved by both the Office of State Budget and Management and by a vote of the Board of County Commissioners of the county or counties.When the county or group of counties receives a grant under this section, the county or group of counties accepts ownership of the satellite jail/work release unit and full financial responsibility for maintaining and operating the unit, and for the upkeep of its occupants who comply with the eligibility criteria in G.S. 153A-230.3(a)(1). The county shall receive from the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction the amount paid to local confinement facilities under

G.S. 148-32.1

for prisoners which are in the unit, but do not meet the eligibility of requirements under G.S. 153A-230.3(a)(1).

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, ss. 2, 3; 1989, c. 761, s. 2; 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2009-372, s. 7; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhhh); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-230.2

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-372, s. 7, effective December 1, 2009, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date, substituted “supervision” for “probation” in subdivision (a)(10).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the last sentence of the second paragraph in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the last sentence of the last paragraph of subsection (b). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 153A-230.3.
Basic requirements for satellite jail/work release units. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Eligibility for Unit. — The following rules shall govern which misdemeanants are housed in a satellite jail/work release unit:

Any convicted misdemeanant who:

Receives an active sentence in the county or group of counties operating the unit,

Is employed in the area or can otherwise earn his keep by working at the unit on maintenance and other jobs related to upkeep and operation of the unit or by assignment to community service work, and

Consents to placement in the unit under these conditions, shall not be sent to the State prison system except by written findings of the sentencing judge that the misdemeanant is violent or otherwise a threat to the public and therefore unsuitable for confinement in the unit.

The County shall offer work release programs to both male and female misdemeanants, through local facilities for both, or through a contractual agreement with another entity for either, provided that such arrangement is in reasonable proximity to the misdemeanant’s workplace.

The sentencing judge shall make a finding of fact as to whether the misdemeanant is qualified for occupancy in the unit pursuant to G.S. 15A-1352(a). If the sentencing judge determines that the misdemeanant is qualified for occupancy in the unit and the misdemeanant meets the requirements of subdivision (1), then the custodian of the local confinement facility may transfer the misdemeanant to the unit. If at any time either prior to or after placement of an inmate into the unit the Sheriff determines that there is an indication of violence, unsuitable behavior, or other threat to the public that could make the prisoner unsuitable for the unit, the Sheriff may place the prisoner in the county jail.

The Sheriff may accept work release misdemeanants from other counties provided that those inmates agree to pay for their upkeep, that space is available, and that the Sheriff is willing to accept responsibility for the prisoner after screening.

The Sheriff may accept work release misdemeanants or felons from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety provided that those inmates agree to pay for their upkeep, that space is available, and that the Sheriff is willing to accept responsibility for the prisoner after screening.

(a1)

Non-eligible for unit. —

If the sentencing judge finds that the misdemeanant does not meet the eligibility criteria set forth in G.S. 135A-230.3(a)(1)b, but is otherwise eligible for placement in the unit, then the Sheriff may transfer the misdemeanant from the local confinement facility to the unit if the misdemeanant meets the eligibility criteria at a later date. The Sheriff may also transfer prisoners who were placed in the unit pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b) to the local confinement facility when space becomes available.

Operation of Satellite Jail/Work Release Unit. — A county or group of counties operating a satellite jail/work release unit shall comply with the following requirements concerning operation of the unit:

The county shall make every effort to ensure that at least eighty percent (80%) of the unit occupants shall be employed and on work release, and that the remainder shall earn their keep by working at the unit on maintenance and other jobs related to the upkeep and operation of the unit or by assignment to community service work, and that alcohol and drug rehabilitation be available through community resources.

The county shall require the occupants to give their earnings, less standard payroll deduction required by law and premiums for group health insurance coverage, to the Sheriff. The county may charge a per day charge from those occupants who are employed or otherwise able to pay from other resources available to the occupants. The per day charge shall be calculated based on the following formula: The charge shall be either the amount that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety deducts from a prisoner’s work-release earnings to pay for the cost of the prisoner’s keep or fifty percent (50%) of the occupant’s net weekly income, whichever is greater, but in no event may the per day charge exceed an amount that is twice the amount that the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety pays each local confinement facility for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical expenses. The per day charge may be adjusted on an individual basis where restitution and/or child support has been ordered, or where the occupant’s salary or resources are insufficient to pay the charge.The county also shall accumulate a reasonable sum from the earnings of the occupant to be returned to him when he is released from the unit. The county also shall follow the guidelines established for the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in G.S. 148-33.1(f) for determining the amount and order of disbursements from the occupant’s earnings.

Any and all proceeds from daily fees shall belong to the county’s General Fund to aid in offsetting the operation and maintenance of the satellite unit.

The unit shall be operated on a full-time basis, i.e., seven days/nights a week, but weekend leave may be granted by the Sheriff. In granting weekend leave, the Sheriff shall follow the policies and procedures of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for granting weekend leave for Level 3 minimum custody inmates.

Earned time shall be applied to these county prisoners in the same manner as prescribed in

G.S. 15A-1340.20

and

G.S. 148-13

for State prisoners.

The Sheriff shall maintain complete and accurate records on each inmate. These records shall contain the same information as required for State prisoners that are housed in county local confinement facilities.

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, ss. 4, 5; 1989, c. 761, ss. 4, 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiiiii).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-230.3

.

§ 153A-230.3.
Basic requirements for satellite jail/work release units. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Eligibility for Unit. — The following rules shall govern which misdemeanants are housed in a satellite jail/work release unit:

Any convicted misdemeanant who:

Receives an active sentence in the county or group of counties operating the unit,

Is employed in the area or can otherwise earn his keep by working at the unit on maintenance and other jobs related to upkeep and operation of the unit or by assignment to community service work, and

Consents to placement in the unit under these conditions, shall not be sent to the State prison system except by written findings of the sentencing judge that the misdemeanant is violent or otherwise a threat to the public and therefore unsuitable for confinement in the unit.

The County shall offer work release programs to both male and female misdemeanants, through local facilities for both, or through a contractual agreement with another entity for either, provided that such arrangement is in reasonable proximity to the misdemeanant’s workplace.

The sentencing judge shall make a finding of fact as to whether the misdemeanant is qualified for occupancy in the unit pursuant to G.S. 15A-1352(a). If the sentencing judge determines that the misdemeanant is qualified for occupancy in the unit and the misdemeanant meets the requirements of subdivision (1), then the custodian of the local confinement facility may transfer the misdemeanant to the unit. If at any time either prior to or after placement of an inmate into the unit the Sheriff determines that there is an indication of violence, unsuitable behavior, or other threat to the public that could make the prisoner unsuitable for the unit, the Sheriff may place the prisoner in the county jail.

The Sheriff may accept work release misdemeanants from other counties provided that those inmates agree to pay for their upkeep, that space is available, and that the Sheriff is willing to accept responsibility for the prisoner after screening.

The Sheriff may accept work release misdemeanants or felons from the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction provided that those inmates agree to pay for their upkeep, that space is available, and that the Sheriff is willing to accept responsibility for the prisoner after screening.

(a1)

Non-eligible for unit. —

If the sentencing judge finds that the misdemeanant does not meet the eligibility criteria set forth in G.S. 135A-230.3(a)(1)b, but is otherwise eligible for placement in the unit, then the Sheriff may transfer the misdemeanant from the local confinement facility to the unit if the misdemeanant meets the eligibility criteria at a later date. The Sheriff may also transfer prisoners who were placed in the unit pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(b) to the local confinement facility when space becomes available.

Operation of Satellite Jail/Work Release Unit. — A county or group of counties operating a satellite jail/work release unit shall comply with the following requirements concerning operation of the unit:

The county shall make every effort to ensure that at least eighty percent (80%) of the unit occupants shall be employed and on work release, and that the remainder shall earn their keep by working at the unit on maintenance and other jobs related to the upkeep and operation of the unit or by assignment to community service work, and that alcohol and drug rehabilitation be available through community resources.

The county shall require the occupants to give their earnings, less standard payroll deduction required by law and premiums for group health insurance coverage, to the Sheriff. The county may charge a per day charge from those occupants who are employed or otherwise able to pay from other resources available to the occupants. The per day charge shall be calculated based on the following formula: The charge shall be either the amount that the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction deducts from a prisoner’s work-release earnings to pay for the cost of the prisoner’s keep or fifty percent (50%) of the occupant’s net weekly income, whichever is greater, but in no event may the per day charge exceed an amount that is twice the amount that the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction pays each local confinement facility for the cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary ordinary medical expenses. The per day charge may be adjusted on an individual basis where restitution and/or child support has been ordered, or where the occupant’s salary or resources are insufficient to pay the charge.The county also shall accumulate a reasonable sum from the earnings of the occupant to be returned to him when he is released from the unit. The county also shall follow the guidelines established for the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in G.S. 148-33.1(f) for determining the amount and order of disbursements from the occupant’s earnings.

Any and all proceeds from daily fees shall belong to the county’s General Fund to aid in offsetting the operation and maintenance of the satellite unit.

The unit shall be operated on a full-time basis, i.e., seven days/nights a week, but weekend leave may be granted by the Sheriff. In granting weekend leave, the Sheriff shall follow the policies and procedures of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for granting weekend leave for Level 3 minimum custody inmates.

Earned time shall be applied to these county prisoners in the same manner as prescribed in

G.S. 15A-1340.20

and

G.S. 148-13

for State prisoners.

The Sheriff shall maintain complete and accurate records on each inmate. These records shall contain the same information as required for State prisoners that are housed in county local confinement facilities.

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, ss. 4, 5; 1989, c. 761, ss. 4, 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 767, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(iiiiiiiii); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-230.3

.

§ 153A-230.4.
Standards.

The county satellite jail/work release units for misdemeanants shall not be subject to the standards promulgated for local confinement facilities pursuant to

G.S. 153A-221

. The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall develop and enforce standards for satellite/work release units. The Secretary shall take into consideration that they are to house only screened misdemeanants most of whom are on work release and therefore occupy the premises only in their off-work hours. After consultation with the North Carolina Sheriff’s Association, the North Carolina Association of County Commissioners, and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall promulgate standards suitable for these units by January 1, 1988, and shall include these units in the Division’s monitoring and inspection responsibilities. Further, the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission shall include appropriate training for Sheriffs and other county law enforcement personnel in regard to the operation, management and guidelines for county work release centers pursuant to its authority under

G.S. 17E-4

.

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, s. 6; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h).

§ 153A-230.5.
Satellite jails/work release units built with non-State funds. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

If a county is operating a satellite jail/work release unit prior to the enactment of this act, the county may apply to the Office of State Budget and Management for grant funds to recover any verifiable construction or renovation costs for those units and for improvement funds except that the total for reimbursement and improvement shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000). Any county accepting such a grant or any other State monies for county satellite jails must agree to all of the basic requirements listed in

G.S. 153A-230.2

and

G.S. 153A-230.3

.

If a county operates a non-State funded satellite jail/work release unit that does not comply with the basic requirements listed in

G.S. 153A-230.2

and

G.S. 153A-230.3

, then the satellite jail shall be subject to the standards, rules, and regulations to be promulgated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 2 of Article 10 of Chapter 153A. If a county is reimbursed for the cost of a prisoner’s keep from an inmate’s work release earnings in an amount equal to or greater than that paid by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to local confinement facilities under

G.S. 148-32.1

, the county may not receive additional payments from the Division for the cost of a prisoner’s keep. However, if reimbursement to the county for the cost of a prisoner’s keep is less than the amount allowed under

G.S. 148-32.1

, the county may receive from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety the difference in the amount received from work release earnings and the amount paid by the Division to local confinement facilities. The Division may promulgate rules regarding such payment arrangements.

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, s. 7; 1989, c. 761, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjjj).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-230.5

.

§ 153A-230.5.
Satellite jails/work release units built with non-State funds. [Effective January 1, 2023]

If a county is operating a satellite jail/work release unit prior to the enactment of this act, the county may apply to the Office of State Budget and Management for grant funds to recover any verifiable construction or renovation costs for those units and for improvement funds except that the total for reimbursement and improvement shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000). Any county accepting such a grant or any other State monies for county satellite jails must agree to all of the basic requirements listed in

G.S. 153A-230.2

and

G.S. 153A-230.3

.

If a county operates a non-State funded satellite jail/work release unit that does not comply with the basic requirements listed in

G.S. 153A-230.2

and

G.S. 153A-230.3

, then the satellite jail shall be subject to the standards, rules, and regulations to be promulgated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 2 of Article 10 of Chapter 153A. If a county is reimbursed for the cost of a prisoner’s keep from an inmate’s work release earnings in an amount equal to or greater than that paid by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to local confinement facilities under

G.S. 148-32.1

, the county may not receive additional payments from the Division for the cost of a prisoner’s keep. However, if reimbursement to the county for the cost of a prisoner’s keep is less than the amount allowed under

G.S. 148-32.1

, the county may receive from the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction the difference in the amount received from work release earnings and the amount paid by the Division to local confinement facilities. The Division may promulgate rules regarding such payment arrangements.

History.

1987, c. 207, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1106, s. 7; 1989, c. 761, s. 5; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-140, s. 93.1(a); 2001-424, s. 12.2(b); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjjjjjj); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 153A-230.5

.

§§ 153A-231,
153A-232.

Reserved for future codification purposes.